Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1399.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:

Req. No. 2579 Page 1


This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Federal Funds


Oversight Act”.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 77f of Title 74, unless there is


created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “state agency” means any


department, board, commission, institution, public trust with the


state as beneficiary, agency, or entity of state government.


B. For fiscal year 2028 and subsequent fiscal years, prior to


accepting federal funding, the Office of Management and Enterprise


Services (OMES) and the state agency which will be charged with


accepting the federal funding shall electronically submit a report


to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the


Speaker of the House of Representatives, the State Auditor and


Inspector, and the State Treasurer, which shall include:


1. A summary of the program accepting the federal funding,


including a citation to the statutory authority for the program;


2. The compelling reasons to accept the federal funding;


3. The performance metrics and achievable goals of the federal


funding;


4. The amount of new federal funding the agency anticipates


receiving;


5. The time frame for the receipt of funds and when the federal


funding ends;

Req. No. 2579 Page 2


6. The federal requirements and mandates attached to the


federal funding and the impacts on the program, state funding, and


goals of the program;


7. A fiscal note disclosing the total cost of federal funding,


including an analysis of the cost of the federal mandates for the


current fiscal year and subsequent four (4) fiscal years. The


fiscal note shall clearly delineate:


a. acquisition costs,


b. personnel costs,


c. maintenance costs,


d. advertising costs,


e. cost-per-person for which the federal funding will


assist, and


f. salvage costs, if any;


8. A statement as to whether the anticipated funding is


allocated through an existing or new federal program and, if an


existing program, the current amount of state dedicated funds


committed to the program;


9. A statement as to whether additional state employees are


necessary to oversee or administer the federal funds;


10. The requirements associated with spending the federal


funds, including any state match or cost share requirements,


percentage limitations, and time frames;



Req. No. 2579 Page 3


11. An analysis of internal controls used to prevent and


eliminate improper payments and fraud; and


12. The process by which the agency will operate and distribute


federal funds to meet performance metrics and goals.


C. State agencies receiving federal funds shall:


1. To the extent allowable under law, leverage the new federal


funding to offset existing state general fund obligations rather


than apply the federal funds to new or expanded programs;


2. Only hire new employees in connection with or as a result of


the new federal funding to limited-service employees whose


employment shall not last beyond the expenditure of the federal


funds;


3. Financially manage federal funding to ensure that the loss


of federal funding does not result in a budget deficit for the


program;


4. Provide complete access to information for OMES to provide a


quarterly update on federal funding and how it is meeting the


performance metrics and goals as stated in this section;


5. Provide complete access for the State Auditor and Inspector


to perform audits on the internal control processes of the agency;


and


6. Report alleged or potential improper payments or fraud to


the:


a. State Auditor and Inspector,

Req. No. 2579 Page 4


b. Attorney General,


c. United States Attorney, and


d. The Office of the Inspector General of the United


States.


D. An agency shall establish a transparency portal on the


publicly accessible website of the agency. The transparency portal


shall provide current information about expenditures of federal


funding that is updated from the close of the prior business day.


The transparency portal shall include:


1. The eligible entities that received a portion of the federal


funding;


2. The amount of federal funding each eligible entity received;


3. The total dollar amount of federal funding disbursed;


4. The amount of federal funding that remains not disbursed;


5. How the agency is meeting the performance metrics and goals


provided for in this section;


6. An analysis and summary of improper payments under the


Improper Payments Elimination and Recovery Act of 2010 for federal


and state funds; and


7. Any documents submitted to an agency by eligible entities


pertaining to federal funding.


E. After the final disbursement of federal funding received by


an agency, the agency shall electronically submit a report to the


Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of

Req. No. 2579 Page 5


the House of Representatives, the State Auditor and Inspector, and


the State Treasurer on all of the following:


1. The final disbursement of the federal funding;


2. The use of the Do-Not-Pay Pilot Program established pursuant


to subsection F of this section;


3. The number of entities that were eligible and ineligible to


receive the federal funding;


4. The savings to this state as a result of the identification


of entities that are ineligible to receive money from the federal


funding;


5. The results of the single audits of the program and how the


agency addressed the findings of each single audit;


6. The results of any other federal or state audit and how the


agency addressed the findings of each audit;


7. The total amount of federal funding received in each county


of this state; and


8. The total improper payments under the Improper Payments


Elimination and Recovery Act of 2010 for federal and state funding.


F. There is hereby established the Do-Not-Pay Pilot Program in


the Office of Management and Enterprise Services. As part of the


program, OMES shall enter a memorandum of understanding with the


United States Department of the Treasury that satisfies the


requirements of this section. Before issuing a reimbursement for


eligible expenses under this section to an entity, OMES shall

Req. No. 2579 Page 6


utilize the Do-Not-Pay Pilot Program to ensure that the entity is


eligible to receive the reimbursement. OMES may promulgate rules to


effectuate the provisions of this subsection.


G. 1. An eligible entity that receives money from the fund and


makes improper payments shall be held liable by this state under the


Improper Payments Elimination and Recovery Act of 2010 for the total


amount of any disallowance of federal funds as a result of the


improper payments.


2. An eligible entity that misuses federal funds may be subject


to civil action.


3. OMES shall provide notice of the penalties specified under


paragraphs 1 and 2 of this subsection to each eligible entity that


receives federal funding.


H. 1. If acceptance by a state agency of federal funding is


expected to cause a reduction in certified funds of the General


Revenue Fund of this state within five (5) fiscal years, the


Governor and the agency shall not accept the federal funding.


2. The Governor, State Department of Education, and school


districts shall not accept federal funding that mandates a public


school in this state to teach a specific program, topic, subject,


curriculum, or standard.


3. If federal funding requirements and mandates by an agency


contradict state law, the Governor and state agency shall not accept


the federal funding.

Req. No. 2579 Page 7


4. If federal funding requirements and mandates by a state


agency prohibit or hinder the agency from enforcement of internal


controls to prevent fraud and improper payments, the Governor and


agency shall not accept the federal funding.


5. If federal funding requires an agency to establish a new


program, the Governor and state agency shall not accept the federal


funding.


I. OMES shall review federal funding received by state agencies


and shall identify the following:


1. Mandates and requirements;


2. Cost of the mandates and requirements identified in


paragraph 1 of this subsection, including:


a. the costs in the prior five (5) fiscal years,


b. the costs in the current fiscal year, and


c. the estimated costs over the next four (4) fiscal


years;


3. Improper payments for each federal program, including:


a. the total amount of federal and state improper


payments over the prior five (5) fiscal years,


b. the estimated improper payments for the current fiscal


year,


c. the estimated improper payments for the next four (4)


fiscal years,



Req. No. 2579 Page 8


d. the improper payment error rate under subparagraphs a,


b, and c of this paragraph, and


e. the reasons for the improper payments; and


4. If a state agency that accepts the federal funding has met


the federal requirements and performance measures of the federal


government.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2579 QD 12/30/2025 11:56:17 PM































Req. No. 2579 Page 9